Connecticut, session 2026, HB05414.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 17a-248e of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) (1) Each eligible child and his or her family shall receive [(1)] (A)
a multidisciplinary assessment of the child's unique needs and the
identification of services appropriate to meet such needs, [(2)] (B) a
written individualized family service plan developed by a
multidisciplinary team, including the parent, [within] not later than
forty-five days after the referral, [(3)] (C) a review of the individualized
family service plan with the family at least every six months, with
evaluation of the individualized family service plan at least annually,
and [(4)] (D) not later than two months after the date on which any child
is determined to be ineligible for participation in preschool programs
under Part B of the Individuals with Disabilities Act, 20 USC 1471 et seq.,
LCO No. 2290 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5414
a referral to register for a mobile application designated by the
Commissioner of Early Childhood for the purpose of continued
screening for developmental and social-emotional delays in partnership
with the local or regional board of education for the school district in
which such child resides pursuant to subparagraph (H) of subdivision
(10) of subsection (a) of section 10-76d, provided a form used for
screening for developmental and social-emotional delays using a
validated screening tool, such as the Ages and Stages Questionnaire and
the Ages and Stages Social-Emotional Questionnaire, or its equivalent,
is provided to any family upon the request of such family for the
purpose of completing and submitting such form to the local or regional
board of education for the school district in which such child resides.
(2) If an eligible child of a member of the armed forces, as defined in
section 27-103, is referred to this state's early intervention system as a
result of such member having received military orders directing such
member to the state or any other documents from the armed forces
indicating the transfer of such member to the state, and such eligible
child was enrolled in the early intervention system in the previous state
or territory with an individualized family service plan pursuant to Part
C of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 USC 1431 et seq.,
this state's early intervention system shall take necessary steps,
including, but not limited to, the transfer of any records and prior
assessments, the performance of any reassessments and, not later than
forty-five days after the referral, the holding of any meeting to develop
a written individualized family service plan for such eligible child, to
ensure a minimally disruptive transition to this state's provision of early
intervention services.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17a-248e(a)
LCO No. 2290 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5414